Utah statutes.
62A-4a-104.   Director of division -- Qualifications.
(1)  The director of the division shall be appointed by the executive
director.
(2)  The director shall have a bachelor's degree from an accredited university
or college, be experienced in administration, and be knowledgeable in the
areas of child and family services, including child protective services,
family preservation, and foster care.
(3)  The director is the administrative head of the division.
